Maryland, session 2025, HB0476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
28–102.
This title applies only in St. Mary’s County.
28–1601.
(a) The Board may not:
(1) issue more than one Class A license:
(I) for every 1,350 individuals THAT LIVE in an election district in
the county OTHER THAN THE 8TH ELECTION DISTRICT; AND
(II) FOR EVERY 4,000 INDIVIDUALS THAT LIVE IN THE 8TH
ELECTION DISTRICT; or
– 1 –

Ch. 801 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) approve the transfer of a license issued under item (1) of this subsection
from one election district to another election district unless the transfer can be made
without exceeding the license [quota] QUOTAS provided in item (1) of this subsection.
(b) The Board shall use the population statistics from the most recent County
Planning Commission annual report to maintain the license [quota] QUOTAS provided in
subsection (a)(1) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –